Mississippi, session 2026, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 39-5-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 39-5-3.  The Department of Archives and History shall be under the control of a board of nine (9) trustees.  * * *The board shall have the power and authority to fill all vacancies occurring therein, whether by expiration of term of service or by death or resignation, but the names of all newly elected members shall be communicated to the next ensuing session of the State Senate for confirmation, and in case it shall reject any of the said newly elected trustees it shall proceed forthwith to fill the vacancy or vacancies by an election. From and after July 1, 2026, the board shall be reconstituted to consist of nine (9) trustees, eight (8) trustees from each of the four (4) congressional districts, two (2) trustees from each district, as such districts existed on July 1, 2026, and one (1) trustee to be selected from the state at large, all of whom shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The initial appointments to the board shall be for staggered terms, to be designated by the Governor at the time of appointment as follows:  two (2) trustees to serve for five (5) years, two (2) trustees to serve for four (4) years, two (2) trustees to serve for three (3) years, two (2) trustees to serve for two (2) years, and one (1) member, the at-large trustee, to serve for one (1) year.  When the board is reconstituted on July 1, 2026, all trustees serving on the board on that date shall continue to serve for a term of one (1) year.  After the initial appointments, all trustees chosen to succeed the present members or their successors shall serve for a term of six (6) years.  The board of trustees shall hold at the State Capitol at least one (1) regular meeting during the year, and as many special meetings as may be necessary, and at * * *said those meetings five (5) members shall constitute a quorum.  The Director of the Department of Archives and History, hereinafter provided, shall be secretary of the board.  The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services other than the amount of their necessary expenses actually paid out while in attendance on the meetings of the board or the business of the department.  The board is empowered to adopt rules for its own government and for the government of the department, to elect and fix the compensation of a director not to exceed the maximum set by the Legislature, and other officials or employees, and to do and perform such other acts and things as may be necessary to carry out the true intent and purposes of this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.